Missouri, session 2026, HB2647.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 26.140, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 26.140 and 301.3064, to read as follows:
26.140. Whenever any consular officer shall have registered as such with the
Department of State of the United States and has been issued an exequatur or a diplomatic
note by the Department of State, the governor shall issue or cause to be issued to such
consular officer an identification card with a short statement of his or her rights and
privileges as such, identifying him or her as a consular officer for the country he or she
represents. "Consular officers", as used in this section, shall be deemed to include consuls
general, consuls, vice consuls, consular agents, honorary consuls, and none other. Such
consular officers are authorized to use a motor vehicle identification plate issued under
section 304.3064 identifying him or her as an official consular officer. Any person other
than a consular officer using such vehicle identification plate shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
301.3064. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the director
of revenue shall issue special motor vehicle license plates to any person who is a resident
of this state and who has been duly recognized by the United States Department of State
as a consular officer of a foreign government accredited to the United States. For
purposes of this section, "consular officer" shall have the meaning as ascribed to such
term in section 26.140.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2647 2
2. The plates shall not contain any wording identifying consular status, but shall
feature a navy blue background color and, upon request of the applicant and approval
of the director of revenue, a depiction of the national flag of the sending nation from
which the consular officer derives appointment.
3. Each plate issued under this section shall display a unique alphanumeric
identifier beginning with the letter "C" followed by no more than three digits, consistent
with the numbering format used for consular license plates under Missouri law and
department of revenue regulation.
4. Such plates shall be issued upon application, presentation of appropriate
credentials issued or recognized by the United States Department of State, and payment
of the established fees as determined by the director of revenue.
5. License plates issued under this section shall be made with fully reflective
material, shall meet the design and safety standards prescribed by the director of
revenue, and shall be clearly distinguishable from other plates issued by the state.
6. Any previously issued plates bearing the words "Honorary Consul" shall
remain valid until the next regular renewal, at which time such plates shall be reissued
in accordance with the provisions of this section.
7. The director of revenue may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
administer this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔